Hawaii statutes.
B. Real Property

§651-91 Definitions. As used in this
subpart:

"Head of a family" includes within
its meaning:

(1) A man and woman when married, except as provided
in section 651-93;

(2) Every individual who is residing on the real
property and who has under that individual's care or maintenance, either:

(A) That individual's minor child, or minor
grandchild, or the minor child of that individual's deceased wife or husband;

(B) A minor brother or sister, or the minor
child of a deceased brother or sister;

(C) A father, mother, grandfather, or
grandmother;

(D) The father, mother, grandfather, or
grandmother of a deceased husband or wife; or

(E) An unmarried brother, sister, or any
other of the relatives mentioned in this paragraph who have attained the age of
majority; and

(3) Head of household as defined in section 2(b) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

"Long-term lease" means a lease for
twenty years or more.

"Owner" means an individual who has
an interest in real property.

"Person" means any individual under
sixty-five years of age other than the head of a family.

"Real property" consists of the
dwelling house in which the owner resides and one parcel of land not to exceed
one acre, upon which it is situated together with other buildings thereon.
This parcel may be in fee simple or any other interest in real property that
vests the immediate right of possession, even though the immediate right of
possession is not exclusive, and includes land held under long-term lease,
ownership rights in a condominium or stock cooperative unit. [L 1976, c 136, pt
of §1; am L 1978, c 46, §6; am L 2016, c 55, §31]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next